Maryland, session 2025, HB0031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
– 1 –

Ch. 546 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(XLVI) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 50. POWERED WHEELCHAIRS REPAIR.
14–5001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS
UNAFFILIATED WITH A MANUFACTURER AND, FOR THE PURPOSE OF OFFERING TO
PROVIDE SERVICES TO AN OWNER OF THE MANUFACTURER’S EQUIPMENT
REGARDING THE OWNER’S EQUIPMENT OR PART, HAS:
(I) AN ARRANGEMENT WITH THE MANUFACTURER UNDER
WHICH THE MANUFACTURER GRANTS TO THE PERSON A LICENSE TO USE A TRADE
NAME, A SERVICE MARK, OR ANY OTHER PROPRIETARY IDENTIFIER; OR
(II) AUTHORIZATION UNDER ANOTHER ARRANGEMENT TO ACT
ON BEHALF OF THE MANUFACTURER.
(2) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES A MANUFACTURER
WHEN THE MANUFACTURER:
(I) OFFERS TO PROVIDE SERVICES TO AN OWNER OF THE
MANUFACTURER’S EQUIPMENT REGARDING THE OWNER’S EQUIPMENT OR PART;
AND
(II) DOES NOT HAVE ANY ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITH AN UNAFFILIATED PERSON.
(C) “DOCUMENTATION” MEANS ANY MANUAL, DIAGRAM, REPORTING
OUTPUT, SERVICE CODE DESCRIPTION, SCHEMATIC, OR OTHER INFORMATION,
WHETHER IN ELECTRONIC OR TANGIBLE FORMAT, THAT A MANUFACTURER
PROVIDES TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING
THE AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER WITH SERVICES PERFORMED ON THE
MANUFACTURER’S EQUIPMENT OR PART.
(D) (1) “EMBEDDED SOFTWARE” MEANS PROGRAMMABLE
INSTRUCTIONS PROVIDED ON FIRMWARE DELIVERED WITH AN ELECTRONIC
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 546
COMPONENT OF EQUIPMENT OR A PART TO RESTORE OR IMPROVE OPERATION OF
THE EQUIPMENT OR PART.
(2) “EMBEDDED SOFTWARE” INCLUDES ALL RELEVANT PATCHES
AND FIXES THAT THE MANUFACTURER MAKES TO EQUIPMENT OR A PART TO
RESTORE OR IMPROVE THE EQUIPMENT OR PART.
(E) “EQUIPMENT” MEANS A POWERED WHEELCHAIR.
(F) “FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS AND COSTS” MEANS:
(1) WITH RESPECT TO OBTAINING FROM A MANUFACTURER ANY
DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, EMBEDDED SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS IN ORDER
TO PROVIDE SERVICES:
(I) TERMS THAT ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE MOST FAVORABLE
TERMS THE MANUFACTURER OFFERS TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER; AND
(II) COSTS THAT DO NOT EXCEED THE MANUFACTURER’S
SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE, CALCULATED USING NET COSTS INCURRED AND
ACCOUNTING FOR ANY DISCOUNTS, REBATES, OR INCENTIVES OFFERED;
(2) WITH RESPECT TO OBTAINING FROM A MANUFACTURER ANY
DOCUMENTATION TO PROVIDE SERVICES, TERMS AND COSTS ON WHICH THE
MANUFACTURER AGREES TO PROVIDE THE DOCUMENTATION AND ANY RELEVANT
UPDATES AT NO CHARGE OTHER THAN, AT MOST, A CHARGE FOR THE
MANUFACTURER’S ACTUAL COSTS TO PREPARE AND SEND THE PRINTED COPY OF
THE DOCUMENTATION; AND
(3) WITH RESPECT TO OBTAINING FROM A MANUFACTURER TOOLS
THAT ARE SOFTWARE PROGRAMS, TERMS AND COSTS ON WHICH THE
MANUFACTURER AGREES TO PROVIDE THE TOOLS:
(I) AT NO CHARGE AND WITHOUT REQUIRING AUTHORIZATION
OR INTERNET ACCESS, OR IMPOSING IMPEDIMENTS TO ACCESS OR USE THE TOOLS;
(II) DURING THE COURSE OF PERFORMING A DIAGNOSIS,
MAINTENANCE, OR A REPAIR AND IN A MANNER THAT ENABLES FULL
FUNCTIONALITY OF THE EQUIPMENT OR PART; AND
(III) IN A MANNER THAT DOES NOT IMPAIR THE EFFICIENT AND
COST–EFFECTIVE PERFORMANCE OF THE EQUIPMENT OR PART.
– 3 –

Ch. 546 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) “FIRMWARE” MEANS A SOFTWARE PROGRAM OR SET OF INSTRUCTIONS
PROGRAMMED ON EQUIPMENT OR A PART TO ALLOW THE EQUIPMENT OR PART TO
COMMUNICATE WITH ITSELF OR WITH OTHER COMPUTER HARDWARE.
(H) (1) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON IN THE
STATE THAT IS:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, NEITHER A MANUFACTURER’S AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER NOR
AFFILIATED WITH A MANUFACTURER’S AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER; AND
(II) ENGAGED IN OFFERING OR PROVIDING SERVICES.
(2) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES:
(I) AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER IF THE AUTHORIZED
REPAIR PROVIDER IS OFFERING OR PROVIDING SERVICES FOR A DIFFERENT
MANUFACTURER OTHER THAN THE MANUFACTURER WITH WHOM THE AUTHORIZED
REPAIR PROVIDER HAS AN ARRANGEMENT AS DESCRIBED SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(II) A MANUFACTURER THAT OFFERS OR PROVIDES SERVICES
FOR ANOTHER MANUFACTURER’S EQUIPMENT OR PART.
(I) “MANUFACTURER” MEANS A PERSON DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE
AND ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS OF SELLING, LEASING, OR SUPPLYING NEW
EQUIPMENT OR PARTS MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF ITSELF TO ANY
INDIVIDUAL, BUSINESS, OR OTHER ENTITY.
(J) “OWNER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS EQUIPMENT OR AN AGENT OF
THE OWNER.
(K) “PART” MEANS A NEW OR USED REPLACEMENT COMPONENT FOR
EQUIPMENT THAT A MANUFACTURER OFFERS FOR SALE OR MAKES AVAILABLE FOR
THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING SERVICES.
(L) “POWERED WHEELCHAIR” MEANS A MOTORIZED WHEELED DEVICE
DESIGNED FOR USE BY A PERSON WITH A PHYSICAL DISABILITY.
(M) “SERVICES” MEANS DIAGNOSTICS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIRS
PERFORMED ON EQUIPMENT OR PARTS.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 546
(N) (1) “TOOL” MEANS ANY SOFTWARE PROGRAM, HARDWARE
IMPLEMENT, OR OTHER APPARATUS USED FOR DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR
REPAIR OF EQUIPMENT OR PARTS.
(2) “TOOL” INCLUDES SOFTWARE OR OTHER MECHANISMS THAT
PROVIDE, PROGRAM, OR PAIR A NEW PART, CALIBRATE FUNCTIONALITY, OR
PERFORM ANY OTHER FUNCTION REQUIRED TO RETURN THE EQUIPMENT OR PART
TO FULLY FUNCTIONAL CONDITION.
(O) “TRADE SECRET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
14–5002.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, EMBEDDED
SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR AN INDEPENDENT
REPAIR PROVIDER OR OWNER TO PERFORM SERVICES WITH RESPECT TO THE
FOLLOWING PARTS:
(1) BATTERIES AND BATTERY CHARGERS;
(2) NONPROGRAMMABLE JOYSTICKS;
(3) JOYSTICK HOUSINGS OR BRACKETS;
(4) WHEEL ASSEMBLIES;
(5) NONPOSITIONING ACCESSORIES;
(6) ANTI–TIP DEVICES;
(7) EXCEPT FOR POSITIONING COMPONENTS DESIGNED FOR
ADJUSTMENT BY A THERAPIST OR AN ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY PROFESSIONAL,
ARMRESTS;
(8) CASTER SPHERES;
(9) COSMETIC SHROUDING; AND
(10) NONPOWERED LEG LOWERERS.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION, TO
PROVIDE SERVICES FOR EQUIPMENT IN THE STATE, A MANUFACTURER SHALL, ON
FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS AND COSTS, MAKE AVAILABLE TO AN INDEPENDENT
– 5 –

Ch. 546 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REPAIR PROVIDER OR OWNER OF THE MANUFACTURER’S EQUIPMENT ANY
DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, EMBEDDED SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS THAT ARE
INTENDED FOR USE WITH THE EQUIPMENT OR ANY PART, INCLUDING UPDATES TO
DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, EMBEDDED SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS.
(B) (C) (1) FOR EQUIPMENT THAT CONTAINS AN ELECTRIC SECURITY
LOCK OR OTHER SECURITY–RELATED FUNCTIONS, A MANUFACTURER SHALL, ON
FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS AND COSTS, MAKE AVAILABLE TO INDEPENDENT
REPAIR PROVIDERS ANY DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, EMBEDDED SOFTWARE,
FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS NEEDED TO RESET THE LOCK OR FUNCTION WHEN DISABLED
IN THE COURSE OF PROVIDING SERVICES.
(2) THE MANUFACTURER MAY MAKE THE DOCUMENTATION, PARTS,
EMBEDDED SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOLS AVAILABLE TO INDEPENDENT REPAIR
PROVIDERS AND OWNERS THROUGH APPROPRIATE SECURE RELEASE SYSTEMS.
(C) (D) (1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) (B) OF THIS
SECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A PART THAT IS NO LONGER AVAILABLE TO THE ORIGINAL
MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) CONDUCT THAT WOULD REQUIRE THE MANUFACTURER TO
DIVULGE A TRADE SECRET, UNLESS COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) (B) OF THIS
SECTION IS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE SERVICES ON THE GROUNDS THAT THE
DOCUMENTATION, PART, EMBEDDED SOFTWARE, FIRMWARE, OR TOOL IS ITSELF A
TRADE SECRET.
(2) A MANUFACTURER MAY MAKE REDACTIONS TO REMOVE TRADE
SECRETS FROM THE DOCUMENTATION BEFORE PROVIDING THE DOCUMENTATION
IF THE USABILITY OF THE REDACTED DOCUMENTATION IS NOT DIMINISHED FOR
PURPOSES OF PROVIDING SERVICES.
(D) (E) A MANUFACTURER IS NOT LIABLE FOR FAULTY OR IMPROPER
REPAIRS PROVIDED BY INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDERS OR OWNERS, INCLUDING
FAULTY OR IMPROPER REPAIRS THAT CAUSE:
(1) DAMAGE TO EQUIPMENT THAT OCCURS DURING THE REPAIRS;
(2) ANY DIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, OR CONSEQUENTIAL
DAMAGES; OR
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 546
(3) AN INABILITY TO USE, OR A REDUCED FUNCTIONALITY OF,
EQUIPMENT THAT RESULTS FROM THE FAULTY OR IMPROPER REPAIR.
14–5003.
(A) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) LIMIT THE LIABILITY OF A PERSON UNDER A PRODUCTS LIABILITY
CLAIM; OR
(2) REQUIRE A MANUFACTURER TO PROVIDE AN INDEPENDENT
REPAIR PROVIDER OR OWNER ACCESS TO INFORMATION, OTHER THAN
DOCUMENTATION NECESSARY FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, THAT THE
MANUFACTURER PROVIDES TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER UNDER A
CONTRACT OR OTHER ARRANGEMENT.
(B) THE REQUIREMENTS AND REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
MAY NOT BE WAIVED OR LIMITED BY A CONTRACT OR OTHER ARRANGEMENT.
14–5004.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any contract that is executed between an authorized repair provider and a
manufacturer, as those terms are defined in § 14–5001 of the Commercial Law Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act, before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 7 –